Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3406
Motor vehicle liability insurance policy; exclusions.

(1) An authorized insurer that writes motor vehicle liability insurance in Nebraska may exclude any and all coverage and the duty to defend or indemnify for any claim afforded under the owner's motor vehicle liability insurance policy, including:

(a) Liability coverage for bodily injury and property damage;

(b) Personal injury protection coverage;

(c) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage;

(d) Medical payments coverage;

(e) Comprehensive physical damage coverage; and

(f) Collision physical damage coverage.

(2) Nothing in this section invalidates, limits, or restricts an insurer's ability under existing law to underwrite any insurance policy. Nothing in the Peer-to-Peer Vehicle Sharing Program Act invalidates, limits, or restricts an insurer's ability to cancel and nonrenew insurance policies.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 6.